Arkansas statutes. Title 28 Wills, Estates, and Fiduciary Relationships
Chapter 69

Fiduciaries Generally

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

Effective Dates. Acts 1993, No. 1228, § 5: Apr. 20, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Medicaid eligibility laws of this state are in immediate need of amendment to comply with federal requirements and assure that otherwise ineligible individuals are prevented from artificially impoverishing themselves to receive benefits to which they are not otherwise entitled and to facilitate recovery of improperly obtained benefits and assure the fiscal integrity of the funds appropriated for Medicaid and this Act is necessary to accomplish that purpose. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

28-69-101. Trust funds — Deposit for safekeeping.

It shall be lawful for any party of whom a bond, undertaking, or other obligation is required to agree with his or her surety for the deposit of any or all moneys and assets for which he or she and his or her surety are or may be held responsible with a bank, savings bank, safe-deposit or trust company authorized by law to do business as such, or with any other depository approved by the court or a judge thereof, if the deposit is otherwise proper, for the safekeeping of the assets in such manner as to prevent the withdrawal of the money or assets or any part of them, without the written consent of the surety, or an order of court or a judge made on such notice to the surety as the court or judge may direct. However, the agreement shall not in any manner release from or change the liability of the principal or sureties as established by the terms of the bond.

History.

Acts 1947, No. 94, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 58-105.

Cross References. Agreement with surety of personal representative as to deposits of trust funds, §28-48-209.

28-69-102. Definitions.

As used in this section:

“Trust” means a trust, or similar legal device, established other than by will by an individual or an individual's spouse under which the individual may be a beneficiary of all or part of the payments from the trust, and the distribution of such payments is determined by one (1) or more trustees or other fiduciaries who are permitted to exercise any discretion with respect to the distribution to the individual, and shall include trusts, conservatorships, and estates created pursuant to the administration of a guardianship;

“Grantor” means the individual, institution, or entity that established, created, or funded the trust and shall also include fiduciaries as defined by § 28-69-201 and third parties as contemplated by § 20-77-301 et seq.

A provision in a trust, other than a testamentary trust, which limits the availability of, or provides directly or indirectly for the suspension, termination, or diversion of the principal, income, or beneficial interest of either the grantor or the grantor's spouse in the event that the grantor or grantor's spouse should apply for medical assistance or require medical, hospital, or nursing care or long-term custodial, nursing, or medical care shall be void as against the public policy of the State of Arkansas without regard to the irrevocability of the trust or the purpose for which the trust was created and without regard to whether the trust was created pursuant to court order.

Subsection (b) of this section is remedial in nature and is enacted to prevent individuals otherwise ineligible for medical assistance benefits from making themselves eligible by creating trusts in order to preserve their assets.

Without question, this section serves the general welfare of the public. Ark. Dep't of Human Servs. v. Walters, 315 Ark. 204, 866 S.W.2d 823 (1993).

Where provisions of a trust relating to the safeguarding of government benefits ran afoul of the public policy as expressed in this section, and for that reason, they were void and unenforceable under this section, the discretion in the trustee to apply trust resources for beneficiary's benefit was comprehensive. Thomas v. Arkansas Dep't of Human Servs., 319 Ark. 782, 894 S.W.2d 584 (1995).

Alleged status as grantor did not take the matter out from under this section where settlement proceeds to meet beneficiary's medical and custodial needs ultimately belonged to him or to the guardian of his estate; the third party's role as the grantor of this trust was something of a guise. Thomas v. Arkansas Dep't of Human Servs., 319 Ark. 782, 894 S.W.2d 584 (1995).

Where grantor's trust prevented the trustee from distributing the principal of the trust until grantor's death, but no provision in the trust limited the availability of, or provided directly or indirectly for the suspension, termination, or diversion of the principal, income, or beneficial interest of the grantor, she was not disqualified from receiving Medicaid benefits. Arkansas Dep't of Human Servs. v. Wilson, 323 Ark. 151, 913 S.W.2d 783 (1996).

Provisions in trusts that limit the availability of funds should the grantor apply for medical assistance or require medical or long-term care are void as against public policy. Arkansas Dep't of Human Servs. v. Wilson, 323 Ark. 151, 913 S.W.2d 783 (1996).

A retroactive application of this section would not disturb a contractual right, or create a new obligation. Ark. Dep't of Human Servs. v. Walters, 315 Ark. 204, 866 S.W.2d 823 (1993).

The department's regulations in effect before this section was enacted did not expressly prohibit a person from artificially impoverishing himself or herself in order to become eligible for Medicaid; the General Assembly, without question, intended to put an end to such contrivances. Ark. Dep't of Human Servs. v. Walters, 315 Ark. 204, 866 S.W.2d 823 (1993).

The event that determines whether the application of this section is prospective or retroactive is the determination of eligibility of the individual for welfare; that determination could be made periodically with the outcome being dependent on the amount of resources and income the individual had at that time. Ark. Dep't of Human Servs. v. Walters, 315 Ark. 204, 866 S.W.2d 823 (1993).

Trial court considered case law from other jurisdictions that permitted the modification the trustee requested in this case, in order to qualify a beneficiary for public benefits, but the trial court did not find that the modification was permissible under public policy and Arkansas law; the court was not left with a firm conviction that a mistake was committed.In re Ruby G. Owen Trust, 2012 Ark. App. 381, 418 S.W.3d 421 (2012).

Trustee intended to modify the trust in order to qualify a beneficiary for public benefits; because impoverishing the beneficiary in order to qualify her would make the trust provisions void, the modified provisions would have been void on grounds of public policy, and the trial court's denial of the modification motion was that the purpose for modifying the trust would be defeated.In re Ruby G. Owen Trust, 2012 Ark. App. 381, 418 S.W.3d 421 (2012).

The legislative intent was to give this section retroactive effect; the legislative intent may be given effect, and this section may be applied retroactively. Ark. Dep't of Human Servs. v. Walters, 315 Ark. 204, 866 S.W.2d 823 (1993).

Publisher's Notes. For Comments regarding the Uniform Common Trust Fund Act, see Commentaries Volume B.

Cross References. Foreign banks and trust companies as fiduciaries, §4-27-201 et seq.

Limited relaxation of the prudent person rule for fiduciaries and financial institutions, §28-71-107.

Effective Dates. Acts 1947, No. 394, § 10: effective July 1, 1947, and applicable to fiduciary relationships then in existence or thereafter established.

Acts 1985, No. 947, § 4: Apr. 15, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is ascertained and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that it is in the public interest to permit trust departments of banks which are members of an affiliated group to use a single common trust fund, which will be for the benefit of fiduciaries and beneficiaries. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this enactment being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1989, No. 351, § 4: Mar. 6, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that banks located in this State should be authorized to utilize their affiliates to perform services for a trust administered by the banks; that such authorization will be more efficient and economical for all parties; that this Act grants such authority and therefore should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

History.

Acts 1993, No. 1228, § 1.

Subchapter 2

— Banks and Trust Companies

28-69-201. Definition.

For the purposes of this subchapter, unless the context otherwise requires, “fiduciary” includes a trustee under any express trust, executor, administrator, guardian, curator, or agent. For the purposes of §28-69-204 “fiduciary” also includes a trustee under an implied, resulting, or constructive trust, receiver, trustee in bankruptcy, assignee for the benefit of creditors, partner, agent, officer of a public or private corporation, public officer, nominee, or any other person acting in a fiduciary capacity for any person, trust, or estate.

History.

Acts 1947, No. 394, § 7; 1975, No. 387, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 58-112.

28-69-202. Common trust funds.

Any trust department of a state bank, national bank, or trust company qualified to act as fiduciary in this state may establish common trust funds for the purpose of furnishing investments to itself as fiduciary or to itself and others as co-fiduciaries. The bank or trust company, as fiduciary or co-fiduciary, may invest funds which it lawfully holds for investment in interests in such common trust funds if the investment is not prohibited by the instrument, judgment, decree, or order creating the fiduciary relationship and if, in the case of co-fiduciaries, the bank or trust company procures the consent of its co-fiduciary or co-fiduciaries to the investment.

For purposes of this subchapter, the term “trust department” or “trust company” shall include two (2) or more trust departments or trust companies which are members of the same “affiliated group” as defined in § 1504 of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended, with respect to any fund established pursuant to this subsection of which any of the trust departments or trust companies is trustee or of which two (2) or more of the trust departments or trust companies are co-trustees.

Unless ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction, the bank or trust company operating common trust funds is not required to render a court accounting with regard to such funds. However, the bank or trust company may, by application to the circuit court of the county in which it has its place of business, secure approval of such an accounting on such conditions as the court may establish.

U.S. Code. Section 1504 of the Internal Revenue Code referred to in this section is codified as 26 U.S.C. § 1504.

U. Ark. Little Rock L.J.

Legislative Survey, Banking Law, 8 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 547.

The investments shall at all times be kept separate and apart from the assets of the bank or trust company.

Any bank or trust company shall be absolutely liable for any loss occasioned by the acts of any nominees of the bank or trust company with respect to any investment so registered.

However, no liability for any loss occasioned by the acts of any bank or trust company, or the nominee of either of them with respect to the investments so registered, shall be imposed upon any corporation or its transfer agent or registrar which registers its stock or other securities in the name of the bank or trust company, or the nominee of either of them, in accordance with the provisions of this section.

U. Ark. Little Rock L.J.

Jans, Survey of Decedents' Estates, 3 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 216.

History.

Acts 1947, No. 394, §§ 5, 6; 1985, No. 947, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 58-110, 58-111.

28-69-203. Investments generally — Liability.

Any state bank, national bank, or trust company authorized to do business in this state when acting as a fiduciary or as a co-fiduciary with others, with the consent of its co-fiduciary, if any, who are authorized to give such consent, may cause any investment held in any fiduciary capacity to be registered and held in the name of a nominee or nominees of the bank or trust company.

The records of the bank or trust company shall at all times show the ownership of any such investment.

History.

Acts 1947, No. 394, §§ 1-3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 58-106 — 58-108.

28-69-204. Registration or transfer of investments — Liability of third parties.

If a fiduciary or the nominee of a fiduciary in whose name are registered, or are to be registered, any shares of stocks, bonds, or other securities of any public or private corporation, company, other association, or of any trust, applies for the registration or transfer of the shares, then the corporation, company, other association, or any of the managers of the trust or its or their transfer agent, is not bound to inquire whether the fiduciary or nominee is committing a breach of his or her obligation as fiduciary or nominee in making the registration or transfer nor to see to the performance of the fiduciary obligation. The corporation, company, other association, or any of the managers of the trust, or its or their transfer agent, are liable for the registration or transfer only where the registration or transfer is made with actual knowledge that the fiduciary or nominee is committing a breach of trust in requesting the registration or transfer or with knowledge of the facts that its or their participation in the registration or transfer amounts to bad faith.

History.

Acts 1947, No. 394, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 58-109.

28-69-205. Investment in obligations of certain banks authorized.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any funds, including capital, belonging to or under the control of any bank, trust company, savings bank, or savings institution and any funds belonging to or under the control of any administrators, executors, trustees, fiduciaries, guardians, or curators of the estates of minors or insane persons may be invested in obligations issued, assumed, or guaranteed by the International Bank for Reconstruction and Development, by the Inter-American Development Bank, by the Asian Development Bank, or by the African Development Bank.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 453, § 1; 1969, No. 349, § 1; 1973, No. 522, § 1; 1985, No. 943, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 58-113.

28-69-206. Deposit of funds — Collateral for uninsured deposit.

An Arkansas-chartered bank or savings and loan association that holds as trustee funds awaiting investment or distribution, if not prohibited by the instrument or judgment creating the trust, may deposit the funds in the commercial department of the bank or savings and loan association. However, if the amount of the deposit exceeds the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation insurance coverage, the bank or savings and loan association shall pledge, as security for the payment of the deposit, bonds constituting general obligations of the United States or the State of Arkansas of a market value not less than the uninsured portion of the deposit.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 837, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 58-120; Acts 2013, No. 1137, § 3.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment substituted “that” for “which” in the first sentence, and deleted “or Federal Savings and Loan Insurance Corporation” following “Insurance Corporation.”

Cross References. Legal investments in savings and loan associations, §23-37-512.

28-69-207. Services provided by affiliates.

Any state bank, national bank, or trust company qualified to act as a fiduciary in this state, is hereby specifically authorized to utilize its respective affiliates to provide services for any trust or estate for which the financial institution or trust company acts as a trustee or other fiduciary, provided the financial institution believes, in the exercise of the standard of care described in §28-71-105, that the services are reasonably necessary and that its affiliate can render such services, including, but not limited to, securities brokerage services, computer services, and banking services, to the trust or estate as competently as similar services rendered by nonaffiliates and for compensation equal to or less than that charged by nonaffiliates. Provided the foregoing requirements are met, an affiliate may be utilized by the financial institution or trust company without the approval or consent of any person or specific authorization in the trust instrument, unless such a power is expressly withheld in the trust instrument.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 351, § 1.

Subchapter 3

— Incorporation of Powers by Reference

28-69-301. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Environmental law” means any federal, state, or local law, rule, regulation, or ordinance relating to protection of the environment or human health;

“Estate” means the estate of the decedent if by reference thereto a provision has been made applicable to the executor or executors of a will and means the trust estate if by reference thereto a provision has been made applicable to the trustee or trustees of such an estate;

“Fiduciary”, and the masculine singular form of the pronoun referring to the fiduciary, means the one (1) or more executors, whether male, female, or corporate, of the estate of a decedent, or the one (1) or more trustees, whether male, female, or corporate, of a testamentary or inter vivos trust estate, whichever in a particular case shall be appropriate; and

“Hazardous substance” means any substance defined as hazardous or toxic or otherwise regulated by any environmental law.

State was entitled to the $5016.61 in appellant's inmate account under the Arkansas State Prison Inmate Care and Custody Reimbursement Act, §§12-29-501 to12-29-507 for a portion of the cost of housing appellant, because any money appellant received as a gift from his mother that was deposited into his inmate account was clearly within §12-29-502(4)'s definition of the term “estate.” This section, which defined “estate” as it is used in the context of fiduciary relationships, did not apply.MacKool v. State, 2012 Ark. 287, 423 S.W.3d 28 (2012).

History.

Acts 1961, No. 153, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 58-114, 58-115; Acts 1993, No. 421, § 2.

28-69-302. Power of court over fiduciary unaffected.

Nothing contained in this subchapter shall be construed to limit the power of a court of competent jurisdiction to prohibit a fiduciary from taking any action or to restrain a fiduciary in the taking of such an action, notwithstanding the authorizations or powers vested in the fiduciary by any written instrument wherein all or any part of §28-69-304 is incorporated by reference.

History.

Acts 1961, No. 153, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 58-117.

28-69-303. Incorporation by reference authorized — Effect.

By a clearly expressed intention of the testator or settlor so to do contained in a will or in an instrument in writing whereby a trust estate is created inter vivos, the language contained in the introductory paragraph of § 28-69-304 and in any one (1) or more of the subdivisions of that section may be incorporated, with appropriate reference made to § 28-69-304, in the will or other written instrument, to be applicable either to the fiduciary authorized to administer the estate of the testator or to the fiduciary authorized to administer a trust estate established or to be established pursuant to the terms of the will or other written instrument, or applicable to both types of fiduciaries, with the same effect and subject to the same judicial interpretation and control in appropriate cases as though the language were set forth verbatim in the instrument.

However, the language contained in § 28-69-304(1)-(4) is appropriate only with respect to powers to be vested in the one (1) or more executors of the estate of a decedent and is available only for incorporation by reference in a will as powers of the executor or executors of the will.

Ark. L. Rev.

Note, Incorporation by Reference, Integration, and Holographic Wills in Gifford v. Estate of Gifford, 46 Ark. L. Rev. 1013.

History.

Acts 1961, No. 153, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 58-115.

28-69-304. Powers which may be incorporated.

Without diminution or restriction of the powers vested in him or her by law, or elsewhere in this instrument, and subject to all other provisions of this instrument, the fiduciary, without the necessity of procuring any judicial authorization therefor, or approval thereof, shall be vested with, and in the application of his or her best judgment and discretion in behalf of the beneficiaries of this instrument shall be authorized to exercise, the powers hereunder specifically enumerated:

In behalf of my estate to join my spouse, if living, or the personal representative of the estate of my spouse, if deceased, in the execution and filing of a joint income tax return to the United States, or to the State of Arkansas, or any other governmental taxing authority or a joint gift tax return, if and when a joint return is authorized by law, if the fiduciary, in the exercise of his or her best judgment, believes the action to be for the best interests of my estate, or will result in a benefit to my spouse or the estate of my spouse exceeding in amount any monetary loss to my estate which may be caused thereby;

To continue, to the extent and so long as in the exercise of the fiduciary's best judgment it is advisable and for the best interests of my estate so to do, the operation or participation in the operation of any farming, manufacturing, mercantile, and other business activity or enterprise in which at the time of my death I am engaged, either alone or in unincorporated association with others;

On behalf of my estate, to perform any and all valid executory contracts to which, at the time of my death, I am a party, and which at the time of my death have not been fully performed by me, and to discharge all obligations of my estate arising under or by reason of such contracts;

Pending the administration of my estate, to permit any beneficiary or beneficiaries of this will to have the use, possession, and enjoyment, without charge made therefor, and without the fiduciary's thereby relinquishing control thereof, of any real property or tangible personal property of my estate which, upon completion of the administration of my estate, will be distributable to the beneficiary or beneficiaries, when, if, and to the extent that the action will not adversely affect the rights and interests of any creditor of my estate, and in the judgment of the fiduciary it is appropriate that the beneficiary or beneficiaries have the use and enjoyment of the property, notwithstanding that it may be subjected to depreciation in value by reason of such use. The exercise of this power will not constitute a distribution of the property with respect to which it is exercised, and, whether or not exercised, neither the power nor the exercise thereof shall be deemed a constructive or actual distribution of the property to which it relates;

During the fiduciary's administration of the estate and subject to all the other provisions of this instrument, to receive and receipt for all of the assets of the estate, and to have exclusive possession and control thereof;

By public or private sale or sales, and for such consideration, on such terms and subject to such conditions, if any, as in the judgment of the fiduciary are for the best interests of the estate and the beneficiaries thereof, to sell, assign, transfer, convey, or exchange any real or personal property of the estate, or the estate's undivided interest in the property, or any specific part of or interest therein, including, but not limited to, standing timber, rock, gravel, sand, growing crops, oil, gas, and other minerals or mineral rights or interests, and to grant easements on real property of the estate, and to participate in the partition of real or personal property in which the estate has an undivided interest, and to accomplish any such transactions by contracts, indorsements, assignments, bills of sale, deeds, or other appropriate written instruments executed and delivered by the fiduciary in behalf of the estate, and to acknowledge the execution of the instruments in the manner provided by law for the acknowledgment of the execution of deeds when the acknowledgments are required or appropriate;

For such consideration, on such terms, and subject to such conditions, if any, as in the judgment of the fiduciary are for the best interests of the estate and the beneficiaries thereof, to lease, for terms which may exceed the duration of the estate, any real or tangible personal property of the estate, or any specific parts thereof or interests therein, including, but not limited to, oil, gas, and other mineral leases, and to accomplish the leases by appropriate written instruments executed and delivered by the fiduciary in behalf of the estate, and to acknowledge the execution of the instruments in the manner provided by law for the acknowledgment of the execution of deeds when the acknowledgments are required or appropriate;

In behalf of the estate, to:

Borrow money;

Evidence the loans by promissory notes or other evidences of indebtedness signed by the fiduciary in his or her fiduciary capacity, to be binding upon the assets of the estate but not upon the fiduciary in his or her individual capacity;

Secure loans by assigning or pledging personal property of the estate, or by mortgages or deeds of trust or other appropriate instruments imposing liens upon real property or tangible personal property of the estate; and

Repay the loans, including principal and interest due thereon;

In behalf of the estate, to borrow money from the fiduciary in his or her individual capacity and to secure the loans in the same manner as though they were made by a third person;

To enter into contracts binding upon the estate, but not upon the fiduciary in his or her individual capacity, which are reasonably incident to the administration of the estate, and which the fiduciary in the exercise of his or her best judgment believes to be for the best interests of the estate;

To settle, by compromise or otherwise, claims or demands against the estate, or held in behalf of the estate;

To release and satisfy of record, in whole or in part, and to enter of record credits upon, any mortgage or other lien constituting an asset of the estate;

To abandon and charge off as worthless, in whole or in part, claims or demands held by or in behalf of the estate which, in the judgment of the fiduciary, are in whole or in part uncollectible;

To pay taxes and excises lawfully chargeable against the assets of the estate which are in the possession or under the control of the fiduciary, including, but not limited to, ad valorem taxes upon real and personal property of the estate which became due and payable prior to the property's coming into the hands of the fiduciary, or which become due and payable while the property remains in his or her possession or under his or her control, excluding, however, income taxes payable by distributees, assessed with respect to income which has been distributed by the fiduciary pursuant to the provisions of this instrument;

To repair and maintain in good condition real and tangible personal property of the estate so long as the property remains in the possession or under the control of the fiduciary;

To invest liquid assets of the estate, and from time to time exchange or liquidate and reinvest the assets, pending distribution thereof, if and when such investments in the judgment of the fiduciary will not impede or delay distribution thereof pursuant to the provisions of this instrument or as otherwise by law required, and in the judgment of the fiduciary are advisable and for the best interests of the estate and the beneficiaries. In making investments the fiduciary shall be guided by the “prudent investor rule” as authorized and defined in § 28-71-105, and the investments thus authorized shall be understood to include, but not to be limited to, loans secured by mortgages, or liens otherwise imposed, upon real or personal property;

Subject to the making and keeping of appropriate records with respect thereto, which will at all times clearly identify the equitable rights and interests of the estate therein, to invest funds of the estate in undivided interests in negotiable or nonnegotiable securities, or other assets, the remaining undivided interests in which are held by the fiduciary in a fiduciary capacity for the use and benefit of other beneficiaries;

To retain investments which initially come into the hands of the fiduciary among the assets of the estate, without liability for loss or depreciation or diminution in value resulting from the retention, so long as in the judgment of the fiduciary it is not clearly for the best interests of the estate, and the distributees thereof, that the investments be liquidated, although the investments may not be productive of income or otherwise may not be such as the fiduciary would be authorized to make;

At any time and from time to time to keep all or any portion of the estate in liquid form, uninvested, for such time as the fiduciary may deem advisable, without liability for any loss of income occasioned by so doing;

To deposit funds of the trust in one (1) or more accounts carried by the fiduciary, in a clearly specified fiduciary capacity, in any one (1) or more banks and trust companies whose deposits are insured under the provisions of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act as now constituted or as the same may be hereafter amended, and if the fiduciary is itself a bank or a trust company, and is otherwise qualified, he or she may serve as the depository;

To deposit for safekeeping with any bank or trust company, including the fiduciary himself or herself if he or she is a bank or trust company, any negotiable or nonnegotiable securities or other documents constituting assets or records of the estate;

To bring and prosecute or to defend actions at law or in equity for the protection of the assets or interests of the estate or for the protection or enforcement of the provisions of this instrument;

To employ attorneys, accountants, or other persons whose services may be necessary or advisable, in the judgment of the fiduciary, to advise or assist him or her in the discharge of his or her duties, or in the conduct of any business constituting an asset of the estate, or in the management, maintenance, improvement, preservation, or protection of any property of the estate, or otherwise in the exercise of any powers vested in the fiduciary;

To procure and pay premiums on policies of insurance to protect the estate, or any of the assets thereof, against liability for personal injuries or property damage, or against loss or damage by reason of fire, windstorm, collision, theft, embezzlement, or other hazards against which insurance is normally carried in connection with activities or on properties such as those with respect to which the fiduciary procures insurance;

To allocate items of receipts or disbursements to either corpus or income of the estate, as the fiduciary in the exercise of his or her best judgment and discretion deems to be proper, without thereby doing violence to clearly established and generally recognized principles of accounting;

On behalf of the estate, to purchase or otherwise lawfully acquire real or personal property, or undivided interests therein, the ownership of which, in the judgment of the fiduciary, will be advantageous to the estate, and the beneficiary or beneficiaries thereof;

To construct improvements on real property of the estate, or to remove or otherwise dispose of improvements, when the action is in the judgment of the fiduciary advisable and for the best interests of the estate;

To exercise in person or by proxy, with or without a power of substitution vested in the proxy, all voting rights incident to the ownership of corporate stock or other securities constituting assets of the estate, and to exercise all other rights and privileges incident to the ownership of the securities, including, but not limited to, the right to sell, exchange, endorse, or otherwise transfer the securities, to consent to, or to oppose, reorganizations, consolidations, mergers, or other proposed corporate actions by the issuer of the securities, to exercise or decline to exercise options to purchase additional shares or units of the securities or of related securities, and to pay all assessments or other expenses necessary in the judgment of the fiduciary for the protection of the securities or of the value thereof;

To employ any bank or trust company to serve as custodian of any securities constituting assets of the estate, and to cause the securities, if they are nonassessable, to be registered in the name of the custodian or of its nominee, without disclosure that they are held in a fiduciary capacity; to authorize the bank or trust company, as agent and on behalf of the fiduciary, to collect, receive, and receipt for income derived from the securities, or the proceeds of sales, assignments, or exchanges thereof made by authority and under the direction of the fiduciary, and to remit to the fiduciary the income or other proceeds derived from the securities; and to pay to the custodian reasonable and customary charges made by it for the performance of the services. However, any such action taken by the fiduciary shall not increase, decrease, or otherwise affect his or her liability, responsibility, or accountability with respect to the securities;

To register nonassessable securities constituting assets of the estate in the name of the fiduciary or of his or her nominee, without disclosure that the securities are held in a fiduciary capacity, or to hold the securities unregistered or otherwise in a form that the title thereto will pass by delivery, without, in any case, increasing, decreasing, or otherwise affecting the fiduciary's liability, responsibility, or accountability with respect to the securities;

In making distribution of capital assets of the estate to distributees under the provisions of this instrument, except when otherwise required by other provisions of this instrument, to make the distribution in kind or in cash, or partially in kind and partially in cash, as the fiduciary finds to be most practicable and for the best interests of the distributees; to distribute real property to two (2) or more distributees in division, or to partition the real property for the purpose of distribution, as the fiduciary in the exercise of his or her best judgment finds to be most practicable and for the best interests of the distributees; and to determine the value of capital assets for the purpose of making distribution of the assets if and when there is more than one (1) distributee. The determination shall be binding upon the distributees unless clearly capricious, erroneous, and inequitable;

To do any and all other things, not in violation of any other terms of this instrument, which, in the judgment of the fiduciary, are necessary or appropriate for the proper management, investment, and distribution of the assets of the estate in accordance with the provisions of this instrument, and in his or her judgment are for the best interests of the estate and its beneficiaries;

To inspect property held by the fiduciary, including interests in sole proprietorships, partnerships, or corporations and any assets owned by any such business enterprise, for the purpose of determining compliance with environmental laws affecting such property and to respond to any actual or threatened violation of any environmental law affecting property held by the fiduciary;

To take, on behalf of the estate or trust, any action necessary to prevent, abate, or otherwise remedy any actual or threatened violation of any environmental law affecting property held by the fiduciary, either before or after the initiation of an enforcement action by any governmental body;

To refuse to accept property in trust if the fiduciary determines that any property to be donated to the trust either is contaminated by any hazardous substance or is being used or has been used for any activity directly or indirectly involving a hazardous substance which could result in liability to the trust or otherwise impair the value of the assets held therein;

To settle or compromise at any time any and all claims against the trust or estate which may be asserted by any governmental body or private party involving the alleged violation of any environmental law affecting property held in trust or in an estate;

To disclaim any power granted by any document, statute, or rule of law which, in the sole discretion of the fiduciary, may cause the fiduciary to incur personal liability under any environmental law;

To decline to serve as a fiduciary if the fiduciary reasonably believes that there is or may be a conflict of interest between its fiduciary capacity and its individual capacity because of potential claims or liabilities which may be asserted against it on behalf of the trust or estate because of the type or condition of assets held therein.

U.S. Code. The Federal Deposit Insurance Act referred to in this section is codified as 12 U.S.C. § 1811 et seq.

Where a testamentary trust provides in plain and ordinary language that only one beneficiary is named and the trust gives that beneficiary the right to dispose of the property free of the trust in her will, the words and sentences are construed in their ordinary sense in order to arrive at the true intention of the testator. McCollum v. McCollum, 328 Ark. 607, 946 S.W.2d 181 (1997).

Warranty deed conveying property from an individual to a trust made no mention of any accrued causes of action pertaining to the property, and the creation of the trust was insufficient to have transferred an already accrued cause of action for the wrongful removal of timber. Therefore, the trustee was precluded from recovering damages accrued prior to the date of the warranty deed.Travis Lumber Co. v. Deichman, 2009 Ark. 299, 319 S.W.3d 239 (2009).

Interest on loans taken by a decedent's estate to pay an IRS deficiency assessment was deductible as an administrative expense under Internal Revenue Code § 2053(a) because, under this section, the estate executor was permitted to borrow money and repay loans, including principal and interest.Estate of Murphy v. United States, — F. Supp. 2d —, 2009 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 94923 (W.D. Ark. Oct. 2, 2009).

History.

Acts 1961, No. 153, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 58-116; Acts 1993, No. 421, § 1.